sv: Sömnadsgrad: Färdigsydd; Halvsydd; Sydd; Osydd; Övrigt
nl: Stikstatus: Confectie; Halfgestikt; Gestikt; Ongestikt; Overig
ko: 스티칭 상태: 기성복; 반봉제; 봉제 완료; 미봉제; 기타
fr: État de confection: Prêt-à-porter; Semi-cousu; Cousu; Non cousu; Autre
vi: Trạng thái khâu: Đồ may sẵn; Đã may một phần; Đã may; Chưa may; Khác
th: สถานะการเย็บ: เสื้อผ้าสำเร็จรูป; เย็บแล้วบางส่วน; เย็บแล้ว; ยังไม่ได้เย็บ; อื่นๆ
es: Estado de la costura: Listo para usar; Semicosido; Cosido; Sin coser; Otro
it: Stato della cucitura: Pronto da indossare; Semicucito; Cucito; Non cucito; Altro
pl: Stan szycia: Gotowe do noszenia (ready-to-wear); Częściowo uszyte (semi-stitched); Uszyte; Nieuszyte; Inny
de: Verarbeitungszustand der Nähte: Konfektionsware; Halbgenäht; Genäht; Ungenäht; Andere
pt-BR: Costura estado: Pronto para vestir; Semicosturado; Costurado; Não costurado; Outro
hr-HR: Stanje šivanja: Gotova odjeća (ready-to-wear); Polušivano; Šivano; Nešivano; Ostalo
pt-PT: Estado de costura: Pronto a vestir; Semicosido; Cosido; Por coser; Outro
cs: Stav sešívání: Hotové k nošení; Částečně ušité; Ušité; Neušité; Jiné
sl-SI: Stanje zašitosti: Konfekcija; Polšivano; Šivano; Nešivano; Drugo
en: Stitching state: Ready-to-wear; Semi-stitched; Stitched; Unstitched; Other
zh-TW: 縫合狀態: 成衣; 半縫製; 已縫製; 未縫製; 其他
bg-BG: Състояние на шевовете: Готови облекла; Полузашити; Зашити; Незашити; Друго
ja: 縫製状態: 既製服; セミステッチ; 仕立て済み; 未仕立て; その他
ro-RO: Stadiu de coasere: Gata de purtare; Semicusut; Cusut; Necusut; Altele
tr: Dikiş durumu: Hazır giyim; Yarı dikili; Dikili; Dikilmemiş; Diğer
el: Κατάσταση ραφής: Έτοιμο ένδυμα; Ημι-ραμμένο; Ραμμένο; Άρραφο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Stav šitia: Konfekcia (Ready-to-wear); Polo-ušité; Ušité; Neušité; Iné
da: Syningstilstand: Klar til brug; Semisyet; Syet; Usyet; Andet
zh-CN: 缝制状态: 成衣; 半缝制; 已缝制; 未缝制; 其他
lt-LT: Susiuvimo būsena: Paruošta dėvėti; Pusiau susiūta; Susiūta; Nesusiūta; Kita
fi: Ompelutila: Käyttövalmis; Puoliommeltu; Ommeltu; Ompelematon; Muu
nb: Sytilstand: Ferdigsydd; Halvsydd; Sydd; Usydd; Annet
ru: Состояние пошива: Готовая одежда; Полусшитое; Сшитое; Несшитое; Другое
hu: Varrás állapota: Hordásra kész; Félig varrott; Varrott; Varratlan; Egyéb